Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Legislative Revenue Officer shall analyze and prepare a report on the
current state property tax system and options to modernize the state property  tax system.
The report must, at a minimum:
(a) Provide an overview of the current state property tax system.
(b) Analyze the effects that Article XI, section 11b, of  the Oregon Constitution (Ballot
Measure 5 (1990)), and Article XI, section 11, of  the Oregon Constitution (Ballot Measure 50
(1997)), have had on the state property tax system.
(c) Describe issues of concern  experienced by property owners and local governments
under the current state property tax system, including  concerns related to budgetary needs,
horizontal inequities, economic development  and tax incidence for property owners across
this state.
(d) Incorporate information, suggestions or  concerns compiled by organizations repres-
enting Oregon cities or counties related to options for a  ballot measure to modernize the
state property tax system,  including an analysis of implications of modernization for prop-
erty owners and local governments.
(e) Present options  to modernize the state property tax system, including a discussion
of the advantages and drawbacks of each option.
(2) The  Legislative Revenue Officer shall submit the report described in subsection (1)
of this section in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for
legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to revenue no later
than December 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.
Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 2321 (HB 2321-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2321 (HB 2321-A) Page 2